Utah statutes.
32B-1-405.   Additional requirements when age is in question.

(1) (a)  In addition to requesting the presentation of proof of age under Section 32B-1-404, an authorized person shall require an individual whose age is in question to sign a statement of age on the form provided under Subsection (1)(b) that includes:

(i)  the date the statement of age is signed; and

(ii)  the number assigned to the individual's proof of age by the issuing authority.

(b)  At the request of a retail licensee, the commissioner of public safety shall provide to a retail licensee the form for the statement of age described in this Subsection (1).

(2) (a)  An authorized person shall:

(i)  file in alphabetical order a statement of age obtained under Subsection (1) by no later than the close of business on the day on which the statement of age is executed; and

(ii)  maintain a statement of age on file for three years.

(b)  A statement of age is subject to examination by:

(i)  a peace officer;

(ii)  a representative of the State Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety, established in Section 53-10-301; or

(iii)  an authorized department employee.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

